Hawaii statutes.
§206J-4 Aloha Tower development
corporation; established. (a) There is established the Aloha Tower
development corporation, which shall be a public body corporate and politic, a
public instrumentality, and an agency of the State. The development corporation
shall be placed within the department of transportation for administrative
purposes, pursuant to section 26-35.

(b) The development
corporation shall consist of a board of directors having five voting members:
The director of business, economic development, and tourism or the director's designee; the chairperson of the board of land and
natural resources or the chairperson's
designee; the deputy director of transportation, harbors division; one member
to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; and one member
to be appointed by the president of the senate. The deputy director of
transportation, harbors division, shall serve as chairperson of the board.

(c) The members of the board appointed under
subsection (b) shall serve without compensation, but each member shall be
reimbursed for expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in the performance
of their duties. [L 1981, c 236, pt of §1; am L 1986, c 146, §3; am L 1987, c
336, §7; am L 1990, c 293, §8; am L 1992, c 34, §1; am L 2000, c 253, §150; am
L 2008, c 200, §4; am L 2011, c 152, §2; am L 2015, c 130, §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next